Missouri, session 2026, HB1836.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 210, 211, 452, and 453, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto
four new sections, to be known as sections 210.162, 211.465, 452.427, and 453.027, to read
as follows:
210.162. A guardian ad litem appointed to a child who is the subject to a
proceeding under sections 210.110 to 210.165 or sections 210.700 to 210.760 shall be
required to have a conversation with such child prior to each court proceeding. Such
conversations shall be held in a private room and shall not be shorter than fifteen
minutes.
211.465. A guardian ad litem appointed to a child who is the subject to a
proceeding under sections 211.442 to 211.487 shall be required to have a conversation
with such child prior to each court proceeding. Such conversations shall be held in a
private room and shall not be shorter than fifteen minutes.
452.427. A guardian ad litem appointed to a child who is the subject to a
proceeding to determine custody, visitation rights, or support under sections 452.375 to
452.410 shall be required to have a conversation with such child prior to each court
proceeding. Such conversations shall be held in a private room and shall not be shorter
than fifteen minutes.
453.027. A guardian ad litem appointed to a child who is the subject to a
proceeding under sections 453.005 to 453.170 shall be required to have a conversation
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1836 2
with such child prior to each court proceeding. Such conversations shall be held in a
private room and shall not be shorter than fifteen minutes.
✔